lexc/noun/enhufnevek.lexc
LEXICON Posskulonb
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Dis:^+cDis^enként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Soc:^+cSoc^est§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^em   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^ed   Fam;   ! d
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^etek   Fam;   ! etek, atok
                           Fam;

! uses Fam, Gen, Case of AddNoun
LEXICON AddNounmindegyik
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Possmindegyik;

LEXICON Possmindegyik
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^őnk   Fam;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^őtök   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok

! uses Fam, Gen, Case of AddNoun
LEXICON AddNounmelyik
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Possmelyik;

LEXICON Possmelyik
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^ünk   Fam;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^őjük   Fam;   ! őjük

!use Poss, plur, fam, case of AddNoun
LEXICON AddNounmennyi
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Possmennyi;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;

LEXICON Possmennyi
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^ünk   Fam;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^őtök   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^őjük   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam;

LEXICON AddNounszelt
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Possszelt;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plurszelt;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam1szelt;

LEXICON Possszelt
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
!+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Famszelt;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Famszelt;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Famszelt;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§AE1§   Famszelt;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Famszelt;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Famszelt;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Famszelt;   ! ük, uk
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§UUE1§k   Famszelt;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Famszelt;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Famszelt;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Famszelt;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Famszelt;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Famszelt;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Famszelt;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§AE§im   Famszelt;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§AE§id   Famszelt;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§AE§i   Famszelt;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§AE§ink   Famszelt;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Famszelt;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§AE§ik   Famszelt;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam1szelt;

LEXICON Plurszelt
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Genszelt;
                            Gen1szelt;
        
LEXICON Famszelt
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genszelt;
                       Genszelt;
LEXICON Fam1szelt
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genszelt;
                       Gen1szelt;

LEXICON Genszelt
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Caseszelt;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Caseszelt;
                       Caseszelt;
LEXICON Gen1szelt
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Caseszelt;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Caseszelt;
                       Case1szelt;
 
LEXICON Caseszelt
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

LEXICON Noun
akármelyik AddNounmelyik;
akármelyik AddNounmindegyik;
akármennyi AddNounmennyi;
amelyik AddNounmelyik;
amelyik AddNounmindegyik;
amennyi AddNounmennyi;
bármelyik AddNounmelyik;
bármelyik AddNounmindegyik;
bármennyi AddNounmennyi;
csakennyi AddNounmennyi;
egyik AddNounmindegyik;
emennyi AddNounmennyi;
ennyi AddNounmennyi;
feleennyi AddNounmennyi;
félennyi AddNounmennyi;
ilyesvalamelyik AddNounmelyik;
ilyesvalamelyik AddNounmindegyik;
ilyesvalamennyi AddNounmennyi;
melyik AddNounmelyik;
melyik AddNounmindegyik;
mennyi AddNounmennyi;
mindegyik AddNounmindegyik;
mindenik AddNounmindegyik;
másvalamelyik AddNounmelyik;
másvalamelyik AddNounmindegyik;
másvalamennyi AddNounmennyi;
némelyik AddNounmelyik;
némelyik AddNounmindegyik;
olyasvalamelyik AddNounmelyik;
olyasvalamelyik AddNounmindegyik;
olyasvalamennyi AddNounmennyi;
semelyik AddNounmelyik;
semelyik AddNounmindegyik;
semennyi AddNounmennyi;
szintennyi AddNounmennyi;
szél:szélt AddNounszelt;
ugyanennyi AddNounmennyi;
valamelyik AddNounmelyik;
valamelyik AddNounmindegyik;
valamennyi AddNounmennyi;
éppennyi AddNounmennyi;
